Alabama, session 2026rs, HB2.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) This act shall be known and may be cited
as the Gulf of America Act.
(b) For all purposes within the State of Alabama, the
body of water that borders the coast of Alabama, previously
known as the Gulf of Mexico, shall be known as the "Gulf of
America." Any reference to the Gulf of Mexico shall be deemed
to be a reference to the Gulf of America.
Section 2. Beginning October 1, 2026, all state and
local entities and their employees shall be required to do all
of the following:
(1) Refer to the body of water that borders the coast
of Alabama as the "Gulf of America."
(2) Reflect the "Gulf of America" terminology in all
newly created maps, documents, educational materials,
websites, official communications, and other resources.
(3)a. Make reasonable efforts to update all
pre-existing resources owned by state and local entities,
including, but not limited to, official state maps, documents,
educational materials, websites, and communications under
their jurisdiction to reflect the name change, where
Page 1

their jurisdiction to reflect the name change, where
HB2 Enrolled
practicable.
b. The requirements of paragraph a. shall not apply if
compliance would impose an operational or financial burden on
the state or local entity and their employees.
Section 3. Nothing in this section shall prohibit a
public K-12 school or public institution of higher education
from using the term "Gulf of Mexico" within a larger course of
academic instruction when reasonable for historical purposes.
Section 4. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2

1, 2026.
HB2 Enrolled









________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 24-Feb-26, as amended.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 31-Mar-26 Passed



Page 3